Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 5. Commercial Driver’s License Act.
§ 63-1-216.
Disqualification and suspension.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year if the person’s license or permit to drive has been administratively suspended under Section 63-11-23 or the person has been convicted of a first violation of:

Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths percent (0.04%) or more, or under the influence as provided in Section 63-11-30;

Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another;

Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year;

Refusal to submit to a test to determine the operator’s alcohol concentration, as provided in Title 63, Chapter 11, Mississippi Code of 1972;

Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths percent (0.08%) or more, or under the influence of intoxicating liquor or other substance, as provided in Section 63-11-30;

Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree which renders the person incapable of driving safely as provided in Section 63-11-30;

Operating or attempting to operate a commercial motor vehicle while the license is revoked, suspended, cancelled, or disqualified;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle in a negligent manner resulting in a fatal injury.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for three (3) years if convicted of a violation listed in subsection (1) of this section, if the violation occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if convicted of two (2) or more violations or a combination of them listed in subsection (1) of this section arising from two (2) or more separate occurrences.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or one hundred twenty (120) days if convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period. A disqualification for three (3) serious traffic violations must be imposed consecutively to any other previous period of disqualification.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person uses a motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug and for which the person was convicted.

A person who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall surrender the person’s Mississippi commercial driver’s license no later than the effective date of the disqualification. Upon receipt of the person’s commercial driver’s license, that person, if otherwise eligible, may apply for a non-CDL, and upon payment of sufficient fees receive the driver’s license.

The commissioner shall adopt rules establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which a disqualification for life under this section, except for a disqualification issued pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection, may be reduced to a period of not less than ten (10) years.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if the driver is convicted of a first violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a second railroad-highway grade crossing violation in a separate incident.

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

A person who is simultaneously subject to a disqualification issued by the administrator of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration pursuant to 49 CFR, Part 383.52 and a disqualification under any other provision of this section shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.

A person’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for one (1) year, if:

The person is convicted of a first violation of operating, attempting to operate or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths percent (0.04%) or more, or under the influence, as provided in Section 63-11-30; and

The person’s commercial driver’s license is issued by a state or country that does not issue commercial driver’s licenses and disqualify persons in accordance with 49 CFR, Parts 383 and 384.

A person’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for three (3) years if the person is convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section, and the violation occurred while the person was transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded.

A person’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for life if the person is convicted a second time of violating subsection (1) of this section, and both convictions arise out of separate occurrences.

A person’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for sixty (60) days if the person is convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or for one hundred twenty (120) days if the person is convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.

A person’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for life if the person uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year, involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug, and for which the person was convicted.

In addition to the reasons specified in this section for suspension of the commercial driver’s license, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the commercial driver’s license of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a commercial driver’s license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver’s license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver’s license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 16; Laws, 2013, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-1-217.
Suspensions and disqualifications to run concurrently.

A suspension of a person’s operating privilege or license and a disqualification imposed under Section 63-1-216 imposed for the same violation, shall run concurrently.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-218.
Effective date of disqualification; hearing.

A disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall be effective on not less than ten (10) days’ notice.

If requested, a hearing on the disqualification shall be conducted, under Section 63-1-53. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to verification of the conviction.

A person aggrieved by a decision resulting from a hearing under this section may have the decision reviewed on the record. The appeal shall be to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or, in the discretion of the licensee, to the circuit court of the county in which the licensee resides or has a principal place of business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-219.
Disqualification from operation of vehicle.

Any person convicted for violating an out-of-service order shall be disqualified as follows except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of ninety (90) days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of one (1) year if convicted of a second violation of an out-of-service order during any ten-year period, arising from separate incidents.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of three (3) years if convicted of a third or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any ten-year period, arising from separate incidents.

Any person convicted for violating an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous materials or while operating a commercial motor vehicle designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, shall be disqualified as follows:

A person shall be disqualified for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of three (3) years if convicted of a second or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any ten-year period, arising from separate incidents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-220.
Penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any driver who violates or fails to comply with an out-of-service order is subject to a penalty of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), in addition to disqualification under this article.

Any employer who violates an out-of-service order, or who knowingly requires or permits a driver to violate or fail to comply with an out-of-service order, is subject to a penalty of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00).

The fine imposed for a speeding violation of a commercial motor vehicle operating in excess of fifteen (15) miles per hour over the legally posted speed limit on any highway shall be one and one-half (1-1/2) times the fine imposed for a speeding violation in other vehicles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-221.
Applicants for school bus endorsements.

An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall satisfy the following requirements:

Pass the knowledge and skills test for obtaining a passenger vehicle endorsement.

Pass the knowledge test covering the following topics, at minimum:

Loading and unloading children, including the safe operation of stop signal devices, external mirror systems, flashing lights, and other warning and passenger safety devices required for school buses by state or federal law or regulation.

Emergency exits and procedures for safely evacuating passengers in an emergency.

State and federal laws and regulations related to traversing safely highway rail grade crossings.

Pass a skills test in a school bus of the same vehicle group as the applicant will operate.

The department may waive the skills test required in subsection (1) (a) of this section for an applicant who:

Is currently licensed, has experience operating a school bus, and has a good operating record;

Certifies, and whose certification is verified by the department, that, during the two-year period immediately prior to applying for the school bus endorsement, the applicant:

Held a valid commercial driver’s license with a passenger endorsement to operate a school bus representative of the group the applicant will be operating;

Has not had the applicant’s operator’s license or commercial driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled or been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

Has not been convicted of any offense that would require disqualification under Section 63-1-216 or 49 CFR, Part 383.51(b);

Has not had more than one (1) conviction for a serious traffic violation while operating any type of motor vehicle;

Has not had any conviction for a violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with any traffic accident;

Has not been convicted of any motor vehicle traffic violation that resulted in an accident; and

Has been regularly employed as a school bus driver and provides evidence of such employment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-222.
Deferring imposition of sentence.

No judge or court may utilize the provisions of Section 63-1-71(3) or 63-9-11(3) or any other program to defer imposition of sentence or judgment if the defendant holds a commercial driver’s license or was operating a commercial motor vehicle when the violation occurred and is charged with violating any state or local traffic law other than a parking violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-223.
Penalty for authorizing railroad crossing violations.

Any employer who knowingly requires, allows, authorizes or permits a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of Section 77-9-249 is subject to a penalty of not more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-224.
Implied consent to chemical tests; administration of tests; effect of refusal to submit to test.

A person who holds a commercial driver’s license and drives a motor vehicle within this state or a person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this state for which a commercial learner’s permit or a commercial driver’s license is required under this article is deemed to have given his consent to a chemical test or tests of his breath for the purpose of determining the alcohol content of his blood. A person may give his consent to a chemical test or tests of his blood or urine for the purpose of determining the presence in his body of any other substance which would impair a person’s ability to drive a motor vehicle.

The tests shall be administered, and all procedures and proceedings relating thereto shall be performed, as nearly as practicable, in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law. However, from and after April 1, 1992, refusal of any such person to submit to such test or a test given which indicates that such person was driving such motor vehicle within this state with any measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in his system or while under the influence of a controlled substance shall require such person to be immediately placed out of service for twenty-four (24) hours and shall require suspension of the commercial driver’s license of such person for the applicable period of time prescribed in this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-225.
Classification of offenses under this article; relationship to other laws.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by this article, any violation of this article for which the only penalty under this article is the requirement that the commissioner suspend the commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license of a person shall not, for the purposes of this article, constitute a criminal offense. However, if a violation of this article also constitutes a criminal offense under the provisions of some other law, then any criminal penalty which may be imposed for violation of such criminal law shall be in addition to suspension of a person’s license under this article.

If violation of any law of this state other than a violation of this article requires that the driver’s license or driving privileges of a person be suspended, cancelled or revoked, then any suspension, cancellation or revocation imposed for violation of such law shall also result in suspension, revocation or cancellation of the person’s commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license under the provisions of this article for the same period of time and to run concurrently therewith.

If any person is disqualified under the provisions of this article and the violation is not an offense for which a person’s driver’s license or driving privilege is suspended, revoked or cancelled under the provisions of some law other than the provisions of this article, then the person may apply for and obtain, upon meeting all qualifications as required by law, any type of driver’s license other than a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit issued under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-226.
Use of certain facilities and property for commercial driver’s license testing sites.

The commissioner is authorized to make use of the facilities and property upon which are located inspection stations, as prescribed in Sections 27-5-71 and 27-5-73, for the purpose of commercial driver’s license testing sites under the Mississippi Commercial Driver’s License Law. The State Tax Commission shall cooperate with the Commissioner of Public Safety in making such property and facilities available for such use; however, the use of the inspection stations by the Commissioner of Public Safety shall not unreasonably interfere with the duties of the State Tax Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2009.